Florida, session 2026, HB705.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (b) of subsection (3) of section
95.11, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
95.11 Limitations other than for the recovery of real
property.—Actions other than for recovery of real property shall
be commenced as follows:
(3) WITHIN FOUR YEARS.—
(b)1. An action founded on the design, planning, or
construction of an improvement to real property, with the time
running from the earliest date of:
a. Completion of the improvement;
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb705-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 705 2026
b. The date of abandonment of construction, if not
completed;
c. The date of termination of the contract between the
architect, landscape architect, interior designer, engineer,
surveyor and mapper, or licensed contractor and his or her
employer, but only as to the architect, landscape architect,
interior designer, engineer, surveyor and mapper, or licensed
contractor who has abandoned construction or whose contract is
terminated; or
d. If sub-subparagraphs a., b., and c. do not apply,
completion of the contract between the architect, landscape
architect, interior designer, engineer, surveyor and mapper, or
licensed contractor and his or her employer. the authority
having jurisdiction issues a temporary certificate of occupancy,
a certificate of occupancy, or a certificate of completion, or
the date of abandonment of construction if not completed,
whichever date is earliest; except that,
2. An when the action involving involves a latent defect,
with the time running runs from the time the defect is
discovered or should have been discovered with the exercise of
due diligence.
3. In any event, the action must be commenced within 7
years after the earliest date of:
a. Completion of the improvement;
b. The date of abandonment of construction, if not
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb705-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 705 2026
completed;
c. The date of termination of the contract between the
architect, landscape architect, interior designer, engineer,
surveyor and mapper, or licensed contractor and his or her
employer, but only as to the architect, landscape architect,
interior designer, engineer, surveyor or mapper, or licensed
contractor who has abandoned construction or whose contract is
terminated; or
d. If sub-subparagraphs a., b., and c. do not apply,
completion of the contract between the architect, landscape
architect, interior designer, engineer, surveyor and mapper, or
licensed contractor and his or her employer the authority having
jurisdiction issues a temporary certificate of occupancy, a
certificate of occupancy, or a certificate of completion, or the
date of abandonment of construction if not completed, whichever
date is earliest.
4. For purposes of this paragraph, "completion of the
improvement" means the earliest of:
a. For an improvement in which the authority having
jurisdiction is required to issue a certificate of occupancy,
the issuance of a temporary certificate of occupancy or
certificate of occupancy, whichever date is earlier;
b. For an improvement that is required to comply with the
Florida Building Code but does not require the authority having
jurisdiction to issue a certificate of occupancy, completion of
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb705-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 705 2026
all required inspections under the Florida Building Code or
issuance of a certificate of completion, whichever date is
earlier; or
c. For an improvement made pursuant to chapters 334-349,
final acceptance, as defined in s. 337.185(2)(c).
5. For purposes of this paragraph, "completion of the
contract" means the later of the date of final performance of
all the contracted services or the date that final payment for
such services becomes due without regard to the date final
payment is made.
6. However, counterclaims, cross-claims, and third-party
claims that arise out of the conduct, transaction, or occurrence
set out or attempted to be set out in a pleading may be
commenced up to 1 year after the pleading to which such claims
relate is served, even if such claims would otherwise be time
barred. With respect to actions founded on the design, planning,
or construction of an improvement to real property, if such
construction is performed pursuant to a duly issued building
permit and if the authority having jurisdiction has issued a
temporary certificate of occupancy, a certificate of occupancy,
or a certificate of completion, then as to the construction
which is within the scope of such building permit and
certificate, the correction of defects to completed work or
repair of completed work, whether performed under warranty or
100 otherwise, does not extend the period of time within which an
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb705-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 705 2026
101 action must be commenced. If a newly constructed single-dwelling
102 residential building is used as a model home, the time begins to
103 run from the date that a deed is recorded first transferring
104 title to another party. Notwithstanding any provision of this
105 section to the contrary, if the improvement to real property
106 consists of the design, planning, or construction of multiple
107 buildings, each building must be considered its own improvement
108 for purposes of determining the limitations period set forth in
109 this paragraph.
110 Section 2. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb705-00